Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 4

Agency Expenditures

5-9-401. County legislative body appropriates agency funds.

All funds from whatever source derived, including, but not limited to, taxes, county aid funds, federal funds, and fines, that are to be used in the operation and respective programs of the various departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices and agencies of county governments shall be appropriated to such use by the county legislative bodies.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 1; 1976, ch. 615, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-924.

Attorney General Opinions. The interest earned on money in the school general-purpose fund may be used by the county government for non-school-related purposes. If the interest earned on money in the school general-purpose fund is not currently appropriated to school funding, it is outside the county's “maintenance of effort” requirement and is not to be used in determining whether the “maintenance of effort” obligation has been met. OAG 13-107, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (12/20/13).

5-9-402. Agency budgets — LEAs — Waiver or alteration — Applicability.

The county board of education, county highway commissioners or superintendents, and each of the other operating departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies of county government that expend county funds shall file with the county mayor for study and submission to the county legislative body or an appropriate committee of the county legislative body a budget as to funds estimated to be required by the particular department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency during the ensuing fiscal year.

The agencies mentioned in subsection (a) shall not be required to file individual budgets when such agencies are under the supervisory control of a commission or a board that files such estimated budget with the county legislative body covering all departments under its control.

If the county legislative body adopts a timeline and budgetary procedures for the county or if the county operates pursuant to a private act that establishes a timeline, then the proposed budgets described in subsection (a) shall be filed in accordance with that timeline; provided, however, the timeline for the budget of the local education agency (LEA) shall be established by the county legislative body with the concurrence of the county board of education.

In the absence of a locally adopted schedule and procedures pursuant to subsection (c), the budgetary procedures for the county shall be as follows:

No later than February 1, the forms for all budget requests shall be delivered to all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies;

No later than March 1, all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies except the local board of education shall deliver the budget request to the county budget committee;

No later than April 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and shall notify the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the proposed budget;

If approved, the county budget committee or the committee's designee shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the county budget committee within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected;

No later than May 1, each LEA shall submit a proposed budget to the county budget committee; provided that, the LEA may amend the proposed budget after May 1;

No later than June 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and shall notify the LEA whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the LEA's proposed budget;

If approved, the county budget committee or the committee's designee shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the LEA shall submit a revised budget proposal to the county budget committee within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected;

If the county budget committee of the local governing body rejects the first and second budget proposals from any department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency, then the third and any subsequent proposals shall be delivered directly to the county legislative body which shall approve or reject the proposal within ten (10) business days of the body's receipt of the amended proposal; and

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the county legislative body within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected.

The timeline and budgetary process pursuant to this section may be waived or altered, if agreed upon by the county legislative body and the respective department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency.

This section shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-925; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2016, ch. 1080, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 17 provided that section 1 of the act, which amended this section, shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted the commas following “superintendents” and “offices”, and deleted “, on or before April 1 of each year, or on such date as may be prescribed by the county legislative body,” preceding “a budget as to funds estimated”; and added (c)-(f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-9-403. Agency budgets — Form.

In all cases in which the form of the budget is not otherwise provided for by law, the comptroller of the treasury is authorized to prescribe the form, including certain standard accounts and classifications for the various operating departments of the several counties, and when so prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury, the budget shall be presented as required in § 5-9-402 in the form prescribed, including the accounts and classifications prescribed for a given county.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 3; 1961, ch. 299, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-926.

5-9-404. Agency budgets — Approval — Continuation operating budget.

It is the duty of the county legislative bodies in regard to all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, or agencies to adopt a budget and appropriate funds for the ensuing fiscal year.

In the event that the local fiscal body has not adopted a budget by July 1 of any year, and until a final operating budget is adopted, the operating budget for the year just ended and the appropriation resolution for such year shall continue in effect by operation of law without further action of the county legislative body; provided, however, all agencies of the county and other entities receiving appropriated county funds shall not during any month encumber funds in excess of the allotment for a comparable month of the preceding fiscal year, unless specifically authorized to do so by resolution of the county legislative body. The authorizing resolution must identify a corresponding funding source equal to the amount of excess allotment authorized. The excess allotments so authorized shall become a part of the final operating budget. During the time that the continuation operating budget is in effect, the budget may be amended according to the procedures for amending a final operating budget, and amendments shall be made as necessary to provide for debt obligations and court-ordered expenditures.

The continuing budget, authorized by this subsection (b), may continue in effect for the months of July and August and, upon approval from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee after a showing of extraordinary circumstances, may continue for the month of September; provided, however, no such continuation budget may extend beyond September 30 of any fiscal year. The county shall submit justification for extending the continuing budget through the month of September to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval by August 15. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may request any additional information as may be required to properly review the continuing budget extension request. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall report the comptroller's approval or disapproval to the county legislative body within seven (7) business days after receipt of the request and any requested supplemental documentation, upon which the county legislative body may take action to extend the continuing budget for the month of September. The fact that the county is operating under a continuation budget shall not, by itself, be grounds for disapproval of a tax and revenue anticipation note or other comparable financing.

If the county legislative body and the county school board fail to agree upon a budget for the county department of education by August 31 of any year, then, by operation of law, the budget for the county department of education shall be equal to the minimum budget required to comply with the local match and maintenance of effort provisions of the BEP. However, if for three (3) consecutive years, the county legislative body and school board fail to agree upon a budget and the department of education receives the minimum required funding for that fiscal year by operation of law, then, the budget in the third year shall include a mandatory increase that is equivalent to three percent (3%) of the required funding from local sources for schools; provided, however, this increase shall not be required if during any of those three (3) years the LEA failed to submit its budget proposals in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-9-402. This subsection (c) shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-927; Acts 2015, ch. 170, § 1; 2016, ch. 1080, § 2.

Compiler’s Notes. For U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 17 provided that section 2 of the act, which amended this section, shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment redesignated former (b) as present (c) and added (b).

The 2016 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “(c) This section shall not be construed as affecting the laws relative to the budget of the county boards of education.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 170, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. May 20, 2016.

5-9-405. Provisions constitute minimum requirements.

The requirements set forth in §§ 5-9-401 — 5-9-404 shall constitute the minimum requirements of any department, commission, institution, board, office or agency of county government.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 5; T.C.A., § 5-928.

5-9-406. Exemptions from application.

This part shall not apply with respect to offices that operate on fees collected by such offices.

Acts 1959, ch. 190, § 6; T.C.A., § 5-929.

5-9-407. Budget amendments — Limitation — Procedure — Applicability.

Under any procedure for amending the budget provided in this section, the budget may not be amended to reduce any expenditure required by law, and all requests for amendments to the school budgets shall be approved by the school board.

Once a budget has been adopted, the budget, including line items and major categories, may be amended by passage of an amendment by a majority of the members of the county legislative body. If an official or department head is requesting the budget amendment and the amendment involves amendment of major categories of the budget, the request shall be submitted in writing to the county mayor and to each member of the county legislative body, and must be approved by the county legislative body in order to be effective. The county mayor may make a recommendation to the county legislative body regarding the requested major category amendment. The written request may be on an amendment request form, if one is specified by the county mayor, otherwise such amendment request shall specify the following:

A description of the amendment, including the purpose of the amendment and why it is needed during the current fiscal year;

A statement showing the cost of the amendment by budget line item with subclassifications showing specific cost elements (personnel, salaries, equipment, etc., included in the line item); and

Funding sources for the expenditure itemized by federal sources, state sources, local sources or fund balance.

After the adoption of a budget for the department of education, any proposed amendments to the budget submitted by the local board of education shall be approved or rejected by the county legislative body within forty (40) days of the receipt of the proposed amendments. This subsection (c) shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In addition to approval by the county legislative body as provided in subsection (b), there are two (2) alternative methods for adopting budget amendments to line items within a major category of the budget by which an official or department head may request approval of the amendment, except that amendment requests that have been disapproved by the county legislative body may not be approved under this subsection (d). The official or department head may request approval by the method outlined in subsection (b) or subdivision (d)(2) without first requesting approval under subdivision (d)(1).

The first alternative method under this subsection (d) to amend line items within a major category of the budget, except for those affecting amounts budgeted for personnel costs and amendments affecting the administrative or other expenses relating to the functioning of the county commission that require amendment by the procedure outlined in subdivision (d)(2) or that require approval by the county legislative body, is by written approval of the county mayor.

Prior to the county mayor's approval, the official or department head of the office or department whose budget is to be amended shall make a written amendment request on the amendment request form specified by the county mayor to include the information outlined in subdivisions (b)(1)-(3). If the county mayor fails to approve such an amendment request, the amendment request may be approved by a budget committee created by law, by a budget committee of the county legislative body appointed by the county legislative body to approve budget amendments, or by a majority vote of the county legislative body.

The second alternative method for approval of any line item amendment, including, but not limited to, any line item amendment that in any way affects amounts budgeted for personnel costs, is by approval by a budget committee created by law or a budget committee of the county legislative body appointed by the county legislative body to approve budget amendments.

Prior to any budget committee's approval, the official or department head of the affected office or department shall make a written amendment request specified by the committee to include the information outlined in subdivisions (b)(1)-(3). If the budget committee fails to approve such an amendment request, the amendment request may be approved by a majority vote of the county legislative body, but may not be approved by the county mayor pursuant to subdivision (d)(1).

All budget amendments approved by the county mayor or a budget committee under subsection (d) shall be reported to the county legislative body in the next financial report.

This section shall apply in every county unless a county exempts itself from this section by the adoption of a resolution by December 31, 1991.

This section shall not apply in any county that has adopted Acts 1989, chapter 550.

In any county that has a private act or has adopted chapter 12 of this title, this section is supplemental authority for an amendment to the budget.

In any county subject to this section that is under chapter 21 of this title, in addition to the requirement of this section, an official or department head shall submit a budget request to the budget committee for its recommendations to the county mayor or county legislative body, or both, for approval.

This section shall not apply to local education agencies as defined in § 49-1-103.

“Major categories of the budget,” as used in this section, means major categories or summary accounts in the latest uniform chart of accounts as prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

This section does not apply in any county having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1991, ch. 358, §§ 2-4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2016, ch. 917, § 1; 2016, ch. 1080, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 17 provided that section 3 of the act, which amended this section, shall not apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment by ch. 917, deleted former (g)(1) which read: “This section does not apply in any county having a population of not less than eighty-eight thousand seven hundred (88,700) nor more than eighty-eight thousand eight hundred (88,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.”

The 2016 amendment by ch. 1080, added (c) and redesignated former (c)-(g) to be present (d)-(h), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 917, § 2. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. May 20, 2016.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Personnel transfers in the sheriff's office — follow-up to OAG 07-106 (7/12/07), OAG 07-163, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 163 (12/12/07).

Transfer of county funds between major appropriation categories as a result of personnel adjustments in the sheriff's civil service system must be approved in accordance with applicable county budgeting statutes, OAG 07-106, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (7/12/07).

Where county commission has hired an employee in the valid exercise of its authority, a county mayor may not unilaterally terminate that employee unless expressly authorized. Nor may a county mayor defund or abolish an entire county department without the approval of the county commission. OAG 14-28, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/7/14).

Chapters 10, 11

[Reserved]